Texas, session 891, HB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The heading to Subchapter G, Chapter 403, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER G. FUNDS AND REVENUE DEDICATIONS SECTION 2.  Subchapter G, Chapter 403, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 403.108 to read as follows: Sec. 403.108.  DEDICATION OF CERTAIN SURPLUS STATE REVENUE FOR SCHOOL DISTRICT AD VALOREM TAX RELIEF. (a) The comptroller shall, not later than the 90th day of each state fiscal biennium: (1)  determine the amount of money equal to the difference between the amount of total available general revenue at the end of the preceding state fiscal biennium and the amount of total available general revenue stated in the comptroller's biennial revenue estimate for that preceding biennium, less any amount of general revenue transferred as required by other law; and (2)  if the amount determined under Subdivision (1) is at least $1.5 billion, deposit to the credit of an account in the general revenue fund 10 percent of the amount determined under that subdivision. (b)  Money in the account described by Subsection (a) may be appropriated by the legislature only to provide school district maintenance and operations ad valorem tax relief. SECTION 3.  This Act applies beginning with the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.